Utah statutes.
31A-35-401.5.   Additional licensure requirements for a bail bond surety company.

(1)  A person applying for licensure as a bail bond surety or agency for the first time shall, in addition to the requirements of Section 31A-35-401, provide proof that at least one principal of the bail bond surety or agency will have a minimum of 2,000 hours of experience working as an employee of a bail bond surety company as a licensed bail bond agent.

(2)  The applicant shall provide proof of the experience claimed under Subsection (1), including providing:

(a)  the exact details of the character and nature of the experience on a form provided by the department;

(b)  a statement by each employer verifying the number of hours the applicant worked for the employer; and

(c) (i)  federal income reporting forms that account for the wages for hours claimed or documented approval of the claimed hours by the insurance commissioner; and

(ii)  the total of 2,000 hours may be proved in part by federal income reporting forms and in part by approval by the insurance commissioner.

(3)  The burden of proving the hours of experience as required in this section is upon the applicant.

